Hawaii statutes.
[§487J-7] Pharmacy benefit managers;
health information; prohibited marketing practices. (a) A pharmacy
benefit manager shall not:

(1) Use an individual's health information, or share
an individual's health information with any pharmacy affiliated with or owned,
wholly or in part, by the pharmacy benefit manager, for the purpose of
marketing, unless:

(A) Use of the individual's health
information is medically necessary to the health and safety of the individual;

(B) Use of the individual's health information
is consistent with regulations of the federal Centers for Medicare and
Medicaid, if the plan is governed by those rules; or

(C) The individual has affirmatively opted
in, in writing, to use of the information;

(2) Sell or disseminate such information unless the
sale or dissemination complies with all federal and state laws and the pharmacy
benefit manager has received written approval for such sale or dissemination
from the employee benefit plan, health benefits plan, or managed care plan sponsor,
and the individual; or

(3) Directly contact an individual by any means,
including via electronic delivery, telephonic, SMS text, or direct mail, for
the purposes of marketing pharmacy benefit manager-owned pharmacies without the
express written permission of the employee benefit plan, health benefits plan,
or managed care plan sponsor, and the individual, unless the employee benefit
plan, health benefits plan, or managed care plan sponsor first determines that
the contact is medically necessary to the health and safety of the individual.

(b) Nothing in this section shall prohibit the
use of a patient's health information that is used in conjunction with an
insurer-authorized program to more effectively use prescription drugs to
improve the health and safety of the individual.

(c) A pharmacy benefit manager shall provide
each individual with an opportunity to affirmatively opt in to the sale or dissemination
of their health information prior to entering into any arrangement for the
lease, rental, dissemination, or sale of such information to any other entity,
or to any subsidiary owned, wholly or in part, by the pharmacy benefit manager;
provided that an individual may freely revoke the affirmative opt in at any
time. [L 2013, c 225, §2]

Note

This section applies to all plans and contracts issued,
renewed, modified, altered, or amended on or after June 27, 2013. L 2013, c
225, §5.

Revision Note

In this section, "pharmacy benefit managers"
substituted for "pharmacy benefits managers", "pharmacy benefit
manager" substituted for "pharmacy benefits manager", and
"pharmacy benefit manager-owned pharmacies" substituted for
"pharmacy benefits manager-owned pharmacies".

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next